Tennessee statutes. Title 38 Prevention And Detection Of Crime
Part 1

General Provisions

38-6-101. Bureau created — Director — Divisions of bureau.

There is created the Tennessee bureau of investigation, which shall be a separate department of state government.

The bureau shall be divided into three (3) divisions, the criminal investigation division, the forensic services division, and the narcotics investigation division. The director shall have full control over all divisions.

The bureau shall be provided with suitable office space, supplies and equipment to perform the duties and functions assigned to it.

A director shall be appointed to administer the department.

The director's compensation shall be fixed at an amount no less than that provided for the commissioner of safety.

The director shall be a person of experience and ability in the detection of crime and shall be appointed to a fixed term of office by the governor from a list of three (3) nominees submitted to the governor by a nominating commission composed of:

Two (2) members to be nominated by the speaker of the senate and elected by resolution of the senate;

Two (2) members to be nominated by the speaker of the house of representatives and elected by resolution of the house of representatives; and

The executive director of the district attorneys general conference.

No person nominated by the speakers shall be a member of the general assembly, and no more than one (1) member nominated by each speaker and elected by each house shall be from the same political party. Members nominated by the speakers and elected by each house shall serve from the date of the member's election until January 1 of the year in which the term of the director expires. If no one (1) of the three (3) persons nominated by the commission is satisfactory to the governor, the governor may reject all three (3), and require the nominating commission to submit three (3) additional names from which to appoint. If none is satisfactory, the governor may require additional nominees, in groups of three (3), until the governor is able to make the appointment. In any case in which the governor rejects the nominees submitted by the commission, the commission shall resubmit a list of nominees within sixty (60) days of written notice by the governor of the rejection. Within thirty (30) days from the date the full membership of the commission is named initially, the commission shall meet, upon the call of the speaker of the senate, and elect a chair. Thereafter the commission shall meet at the call of the chair and shall, within sixty (60) days of the initial meeting, submit its initial list of nominees to the governor. In the case of a vacancy in the office of director arising during a term, the commission shall meet and submit a list of nominees within ninety (90) days of the date of the vacancy. In such a case, the appointment by the governor shall be for the unexpired portion of the director's term. With respect to the appointment of a director to a new term of office, the nominating commission shall be named no later than one hundred twenty (120) days before the expiration of the prior term. In such case the commission shall meet initially at the call of the speaker of the senate, elect a chair and shall then meet and make its submission of nominees no later than thirty (30) days prior to expiration of the term. The first term of office of the director shall begin on March 27, 1980, and shall extend through June 30, 1986. The next term shall begin on July 1, 1986, and it, and all successive terms shall be of six (6) full years. The nominating commission, as defined under this section, shall be subject to title 8, chapter 44.

The director shall be subject to removal from office under title 8, chapter 47, but in the case of suspension of the director under § 8-47-116, the office of director shall be filled pending final disposition of the removal proceeding by the official in charge of the criminal investigation division of the bureau.

The official in charge of the criminal investigation division of the bureau shall likewise serve as acting director of the bureau from the occurrence of any vacancy in the office of director until a director is appointed, as provided for in this chapter.

Acts 1951, ch. 173, § 1 (Williams, § 11465.10); Acts 1980, ch. 636, §§ 1, 13, 15; impl. am. Acts 1982, ch. 733, § 4; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 38-501; Acts 1998, ch. 1069, § 1; 2007, ch. 260, §§ 1-4.

Compiler's Notes. The Tennessee bureau of investigation, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2021. See §§ 4-29-112, 4-29-242.

Acts 2018, ch. 653, § 3 provided that the Tennessee bureau of investigation shall appear before the government operations joint evaluation committee on judiciary and government no later than December 31, 2018, to update the committee on the department's progress in addressing the findings set forth in the January 2018 performance audit report.

Cross-References. Commissioner of safety, salary, § 8-23-101.

Peace officer standards and training commission, director of bureau as member, § 38-8-102.

Registration of persons acting as law enforcement officers, § 8-8-221.

Representatives of Tennessee bureau of investigation as ex officio members of child sexual abuse task force, § 37-1-603.

38-6-102. Criminal investigation division — Criminal intelligence unit — Investigations into domestic terrorism — Emergency situation traffic stops.

The criminal investigation division shall consist of not less than six (6) persons who shall be experienced in the detection of crime and in criminal work generally. The director, with the approval of the governor, however, may increase the number of persons employed in the criminal investigation division, to such number as may be found to be feasible and necessary. At least two (2) of the criminal investigators shall be normally detailed to service in each grand division of the state, but the director shall have power to detail any and all of the investigators to service in grand divisions in case of emergency. The director, upon the request of the district attorney general of any judicial district, may assign the criminal investigators to aid that district attorney general in the investigation of any crime committed in the district attorney general's judicial district, but only when the district attorney general requests such aid. When detailed by the director to aid the district attorney general, the criminal investigators shall have full power to issue subpoenas for witnesses, serve the subpoenas, administer oaths to witnesses as they may summon, to take written statements from them and, when so detailed, shall have the same powers with reference to the execution of criminal process, making arrests, and the like, as does the sheriff of the county in which the investigators are at work.

Investigators of the bureau of investigation are authorized, without a request from the district attorney general, to make investigations in connection with any matters pertaining to:

Fugitives from justice;

Commission of any offense prohibited by title 39, chapter 16, part 4, or any other offense involving corruption of or misconduct by a public official;

Employees or prospective employees of the bureau or the department of safety;

Organized crime activities;

Fraudulent conduct involving social security administration Title II and Title XVI disability programs; provided, however, that the authority conferred upon the bureau by this subdivision (b)(1)(E) shall automatically terminate upon discontinuation of federal funding for reimbursement of bureau costs associated with investigations of fraudulent conduct involving Title II and Title XVI disability programs;

Victimization of children by means of a computer or other electronic communications device;

Commission of an offense involving any form of trafficking prohibited by title 39, chapter 13, part 3; or

Commission of an offense prohibited by title 39, chapter 14, part 3.

For the purposes of subsection (b), “organized crime” is defined as the unlawful activities of the members of an organized, disciplined association engaged in supplying illegal goods and services, including, but not limited to, gambling, prostitution, loan sharking, narcotics, labor racketeering, and other unlawful activities of members of such organizations.

The bureau is authorized to investigate allegations of felonious conduct resulting in serious bodily injury to a state inmate who is housed in a county or private correctional facility where the alleged perpetrator is an official, employee or trustee of the county or a private vendor if, after the district attorney general is notified by the department of correction of such felonious conduct, the district attorney general refuses to request the bureau to make an investigation. The bureau shall forward the results of any such investigation to the department of correction and the district attorney general.

The bureau also is authorized, upon the request of the governor, the attorney general and reporter, any member of the board, the commissioner of correction or a district attorney general to conduct investigations into allegations of fraud, corruption, or dishonesty involving the granting, revoking or denying of paroles, release classification status or executive clemency of any type. The governor, a district attorney general, the attorney general and reporter, or the board of parole acting at the request of the governor, may request the assistance of the bureau to determine whether any recipient of executive clemency of any type has been or is presently abiding by the terms and conditions imposed upon the governor's granting of executive clemency of any type.

The bureau shall coordinate its activities whenever possible with municipal, county, and federal police agencies with emphasis toward providing strike force capabilities to high crime areas within the state.

The bureau shall continue to utilize the communications systems of the department of safety.

The bureau is also authorized, in consultation with the appropriate department or agency, to conduct an investigation into a violation of a criminal offense:

In which the victim of the offense is a state employee or contractor who was acting in the employee or contractor's official capacity at the time of the offense;

That resulted in state property being damaged or destroyed as a result of the offense; or

That delayed the administration of state government at a significant cost to the state.

Whenever a district attorney general refuses or neglects to present the results of any investigation undertaken under this section to a grand jury, the director, or the director's designated representative, may appear before the grand jury and seek a presentment, and the grand jury shall have the power to issue compulsory process for the appearance of witnesses. In the event the grand jury returns a presentment and the district attorney general refuses to prosecute, the director may petition for the appointment of a district attorney general pro tempore as provided for in § 8-7-106.

The director shall cause to be established within the criminal investigation division a criminal intelligence unit (CIU). It shall be the responsibility of the CIU, through the automated criminal intelligence system of Tennessee (ACIST), as well as through criminal investigators assigned to each of the bureau's four regional offices, to gather and maintain criminal intelligence on criminal gang activity. Intelligence collected pursuant to this section shall be reviewed for compliance with 28 CFR Part 23.20 and shall be disseminated to local, state, and federal law enforcement agencies pursuant to 28 CFR Part 23.20. The bureau shall analyze all criminal intelligence collected, and shall compile statistical information for dissemination through the national incident-based reporting system (NIBRS) and the bureau's annual report.

Investigators of the bureau of investigation are authorized, without a request from the district attorney general, to make investigations based upon intelligence information pertaining to domestic terrorism that the bureau received under a government information security classification. Investigators may make investigations based upon intelligence information pertaining to domestic terrorism that the bureau received from nonclassified sources upon the request of the district attorney general.

Investigators of the bureau of investigation are authorized, without a request from the district attorney general, to make traffic stops in emergency situations in which the safety of the public is in jeopardy and no officer from the appropriate law enforcement agency is immediately available to make the stop. For purposes of this subdivision (e)(2), “emergency situations” is limited to driving under the influence of an intoxicant pursuant to § 55-10-401, and reckless endangerment pursuant to § 39-13-103 involving the traffic stop. Investigators may also assist stranded motorists.

On or before January 1, 2022, the district attorneys general conference shall file a report with the speakers of the senate and house of representatives and the chairs of the judiciary committees of the senate and house of representatives detailing by geographic location within this state:

The aggregate number of reports of potential violations of criminal offenses described in subdivision (b)(2)(F);

The action taken by the appropriate district attorney for each report; and

The legal disposition of any case resulting from each report.

Acts 1951, ch. 173, § 2 (Williams, § 11465.11); Acts 1957, ch. 134, § 1; 1957, ch. 216, § 1; 1961, ch. 297, § 1; 1970, ch. 362, § 1; 1979, ch. 359, § 9; 1980, ch. 636, § 2; impl. am. Acts 1980, ch. 636, § 13; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 38-502; Acts 1995, ch. 469, § 1; 1996, ch. 944, § 47; 1996, ch. 1066, § 1; 1997, ch. 541, § 1; 1998, ch. 1049, § 6; 1998, ch. 1069, § 2; 1999, ch. 520, § 38; 2000, ch. 852, § 9; 2001, ch. 313, § 1; 2002, ch. 849, § 9; 2003, ch. 355, § 15; 2008, ch. 988, § 1; 2008, ch. 1039, § 1; 2015, ch. 503, § 2; 2016, ch. 1041, § 1; 2020 (2nd Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, §§ 22, 23.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2001, ch. 313, § 2 provided that the 2001 amendment shall be void and cease to be of effect at any time federal funding is not available to fund the positions and operations required by the amendment.

Titles II and XVI of the Social Security Act, referred to in this section, are compiled as 42 U.S.C. § 401 et seq. and 42 U.S.C. § 1381 et seq., respectively.

Acts 2003, ch. 355, § 66 provided that no expenditure of public funds pursuant to the act shall be made in violation of the provisions of Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964, as codified in 42 U.S.C. § 2000(d).

Acts 2003, ch. 355, § 73 provided that there is established within the general fund the state-shared revenue reduction mitigation account. Any amounts in the state-shared revenue reduction mitigation account shall be applied by the commissioner of finance and administration to offset reductions in state-shared revenues allocated to local governments pursuant to the provisions of the act so that such reductions shall not exceed nine percent (9%) of state-shared revenues that otherwise would have been allocated to any such local government. Funds shall be restored on a pro rata basis taking into account the percentage reduction to each local government from each state-shared revenue source.

For the Preamble to the act concerning a uniform framework of laws that will protect the rights of all Tennesseans to peacefully demonstrate, see Acts 2020 (2nd Ex. Sess.), ch. 3.

2020 (2nd Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 26 provided that the act, which amended this section, applies to offenses committed after August 20, 2020.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment added (b)(1)(G).

The 2016 amendment added (b)(1)(H).

The 2020 (2nd Ex. Sess.) amendment by ch. 3 added (b)(2)(F) and (f).

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 503, § 3. July 1, 2015.

Acts 2016, ch. 1041, § 2. April 28, 2016.

Acts 2020 (2nd Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 26. August 20, 2020.

Cross-References. Criminal gang offenses, § 40-35-121.

Disaster assistance, § 58-8-103.

Disposal of confiscated gambling devices, § 38-6-111.

Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.

Peace officers of the office of homeland security, § 38-3-114.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), § 1.21.

38-6-103. Forensic services division — Purchase of breathalyzer tests by local governments.

The forensic services division shall consist of experts in the scientific detection of crime. The director is empowered to employ, either upon a temporary or permanent basis, but is not limited to, ballistics experts, pathologists, toxicologists, experts in the detection of human bloodstains and fingerprint experts and such other persons of expert knowledge in the detection of crime as may be found feasible. It shall be the duty of the forensic services division to keep a complete record of fingerprints obtained by it through exchange with the federal bureau of investigation, with similar bureaus in other states and from fingerprints obtained in this state. Each peace officer of this state, upon fingerprinting any person arrested, shall furnish a copy of the fingerprints to the forensic services division of the bureau. Likewise, such fingerprints as are now on file at the state penitentiary shall be transferred from the penitentiary to the bureau and maintained by it. Each person received at the state penitentiary shall be fingerprinted and a copy of the fingerprints furnished to the bureau. The bureau is authorized to exchange with the federal bureau of investigation any and all information obtained by the bureau in the course of its work and to request of the federal bureau of investigation such information as the bureau may desire.

The services of the forensic services division may be made available by the director to any district attorney general of this state, the chief medical examiner and all county medical examiners in the performance of their duties under the post-mortem examination law or to any peace officer upon the approval of the district attorney general of the district in which such peace officer is located. The forensic services division likewise is authorized to avail itself of the services of any and all other departments of the state where the same may be of benefit to it, including, but not limited to, the state chemists and other expert personnel.

The Tennessee crime laboratory and all regional crime laboratories shall be under the supervision of the director of the bureau or the director's designated representatives.

The following fees shall be adjudged as a part of the costs in each case upon conviction of the following offenses:

Controlled substances, controlled substance analogues, narcotics, drugs $20.00

Driving a motor vehicle, or operating a boat while under the influence of intoxicants and/or drugs, except as provided in § 55-10-413(d) 17.50

Certification of criminal histories and records Amount fixed by the federal bureau of investigation

Upon the forfeiture of a cash bond or other surety entered as a result of a municipal traffic citation, whether considered a fine, a bond or a tax 13.75.

Such fees shall be in addition to and not in substitution for any and all fines and penalties otherwise provided for by law.

Except when and as provided in this subdivision (d)(1) and subdivision (e)(2), the appropriate clerk, after deducting five percent (5%) as compensation when applicable, shall identify those fees set out in subdivisions (d)(1)(A)(i)-(iv) to the Tennessee bureau of investigation and remit the fees to the state treasury to be expended as appropriated by the general assembly.

Any moneys in the TBI fund, created pursuant to Chapter 1019 of the Public Acts of 2010, on June 30, 2020, shall revert to the general fund on such date, to be used only as appropriated by the general assembly.

Upon approval of the director, local governing bodies which have the responsibility for providing funding for sheriffs' offices and police departments are authorized to purchase from state contracts approved for bureau purchases, scientific instruments designed to examine a person's breath and measure the alcohol content of a person's breath, for use as evidence in the trial of cases; provided, that prior to use of the scientific instruments, such instruments must be delivered to the forensic services division for testing and certification pursuant to subsection (g). The bureau shall continue to maintain and certify the instruments and operating personnel, pursuant to subsection (g), and furnish expert testimony in support of the use of the scientific instruments when required.

Any fees authorized for services rendered by the bureau that are not incident to a court case shall be paid to the Tennessee bureau of investigation for deposit with the state treasurer for expenditure as provided for by this section.

Every local governing body purchasing the instruments pursuant to subsection (d) shall report the use of the instrument to the clerk of the court, for inclusion of the service fee as a part of the court costs, which service fee shall be disbursed to the local governing body until the purchase price is recovered. Thereafter, the service fee shall be disbursed by the clerk to the bureau, for payment to the state treasurer as required by subsection (f).

All revenue resulting from fines, forfeitures and services rendered by the bureau shall be paid to the state treasurer and used only as appropriated by the general assembly.

The bureau, through its forensic services division, shall establish, authorize, approve and certify techniques, methods, procedures and instruments for the scientific examination and analysis of evidence, including blood, urine, breath or other bodily substances, and teach and certify qualifying personnel in the operation of such instruments to meet the requirements of the law for the admissibility of evidence. When examinations, tests and analyses have been performed in compliance with these standards and procedures, the results shall be prima facie admissible into evidence in any judicial or quasi-judicial proceeding, subject to the rules of evidence as administered by the courts.

Effective July 1, 2006, there is created within the Tennessee bureau of investigation's serology/DNA unit, six (6) additional special agent/forensic scientist positions to perform DNA analysis in criminal investigations. The positions shall be in addition to any position that was created and funded prior to July 1, 2006, or that may be created in the future. The director shall determine to which of the bureau's forensic laboratories each of the six (6) special agents/forensic scientists employed pursuant to this subsection (h) shall be assigned. The assignments shall be based upon the number of criminal investigations requiring DNA analysis in each of the laboratories, the DNA analysis backlog and such other factors as the director determines will most quickly and efficiently reduce the backlog of DNA samples awaiting analysis.

When the backlog of criminal investigations awaiting DNA analysis becomes current, the director shall continue to utilize these six (6) positions in the various bureau laboratories, as needed to prevent any future backlog of analysis requests and to expedite the analysis of future requests.

Acts 1951, ch. 173, § 3 (Williams, § 11465.12); Acts 1980, ch. 636, § 3; 1980, ch. 810, § 1; 1981, ch. 512, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 38-503; Acts 1985, ch. 124, §§ 1-3; 1987, ch. 104, § 1; 1990, ch. 847, § 1; 2006, ch. 891, § 1; 2006, ch. 998, § 3; 2007, ch. 374, § 3; 2010, ch. 1019, § 1; 2011, ch. 49, § 1; 2012, ch. 848, § 10; 2012, ch. 1088, § 1; 2013, ch. 154, § 32; 2020, ch. 668, § 1.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment, in (d)(1)(C), substituted “subdivision (d)(1)(A)(i)-(iv)” for “subdivision (d)(1)(A)” and deleted “by the Tennessee bureau of investigation” following “state treasury to be expanded” in the first sentence, and deleted the last three sentences, which read: “These fees shall be transmitted by the clerk of the court to the state treasurer for deposit in a fund to be used by the Tennessee bureau of investigation for the purpose of employing personnel; for the purchase of equipment and supplies; to pay for the education, training and scientific development of employees; or for any other purpose to allow the bureau's business to be done in a more efficient and expeditious manner. The moneys received in the fund shall be invested for the benefit of the fund by the state treasurer pursuant to § 9-4-603. Amounts in the fund shall not revert to the general fund of the state, but shall, together with interest income credited to the fund, remain available for expenditure in subsequent fiscal years.”; and added (d)(1)(D).

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 668, § 6. April 2, 2020.

Cross-References. Post-Mortem Examination Act, title 38, ch. 7.

38-6-104. Personnel — Injuries in the line of duty.

The director may employ such clerical and stenographic personnel as may be needed for the efficient operation of the bureau. Salaries of the personnel of the bureau shall be fixed by the director and paid from the funds appropriated to the bureau by the general assembly. Nothing contained in this section shall affect in any way the retirement benefits and longevity pay as are now provided for the personnel for the Tennessee bureau of criminal identification. All funds, supplies and equipment now allocated for the use and benefit of the Tennessee bureau of criminal identification are transferred to the separate department created by this chapter for the use and benefit of the bureau.

When a member of the bureau is injured in the line of duty and that injury prevents the member from performing the member's regular duties, whether the disability is temporary or permanent, it is lawful for the director, in the director's sound discretion and with the approval of the governor and the attorney general and reporter, to retain the disabled member of the bureau upon the regular payroll of the bureau until the member's claim for compensation for the disability is determined by the state board of claims. The state board of claims shall act within thirty (30) days of receipt of a disability rating based upon competent medical advice.

Acts 1951, ch. 173, § 4 (Williams, § 11465.13); Acts 1980, ch. 636, § 4; 1981, ch. 402, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 38-504.

Cross-References. Board of claims, title 9, ch. 8.

38-6-105. Retired agents.

Any agent or uniformed law enforcement officer of the Tennessee bureau of investigation who retires after twenty-five (25) years of honorable service shall be issued a retired commission card by the bureau. The card shall identify the agent or uniformed law enforcement officer and that the agent or uniformed law enforcement officer is retired. Cards issued under this provision shall bear the inscription, in print of equal or larger size than the rest of the printing on the card, the words “Not a handgun permit.” After twenty-five (25) years of honorable service by an agent or uniformed law enforcement officer of the bureau, in recognition of the agent's or uniformed law enforcement officer's many years of good and faithful public service, the bureau shall authorize the agent or uniformed law enforcement officer to retain the agent's or uniformed law enforcement officer's service weapon.

Acts 1974, ch. 710, § 2; 1980, ch. 636, § 5; T.C.A., § 38-505; Acts 1995, ch. 273, § 1; 1996, ch. 675, § 18; 2018, ch. 727, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Former subsection (b), concerning an agent of the alcoholic beverage commission who retires after twenty-five years of service being issued a retired commission card and being authorized to retain the agent's service weapon, was transferred by the code commission to § 57-1-212 in 2006.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment rewrote the section which read: “Any agent of the Tennessee bureau of investigation who retires after twenty-five (25) years of honorable service shall be issued a retired commission card by the bureau, which shall identify the agent, the agent's department and rank, and the fact that the agent is retired. Cards issued under this provision shall bear the inscription, in print of equal or larger size than the rest of the printing on the card, the words “Not a handgun permit.” After twenty-five (25) years of honorable service by an agent of the bureau, the bureau shall authorize such agent, upon retirement, to retain the agent's service weapon, in recognition of the agent's many years of good and faithful public service.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 727, § 2. April 18, 2018.

38-6-106. Requests for investigative records — Background checks of appointees.

Any request for investigative records by the governor, speaker of the senate, speaker of the house of representatives or supreme court chief justice shall be in writing and shall state specifically the reasons for such request. All such written requests shall be signed by the governor, speaker of the senate, speaker of the house of representatives or chief justice and not the governor's, speaker's or chief justice's agent or designee.

The governor, speaker of the senate, speaker of the house of representatives or chief justice is authorized to request the director of the Tennessee bureau of investigation to conduct a background investigation concerning any person who has asked or agreed to be considered by the governor, speaker of the senate, speaker of the house of representatives or chief justice for appointment to a position of trust and responsibility, including, but not limited to, positions relating to homeland security. The chair of the nominating commission appointed pursuant to § 38-6-101 is authorized to request a background investigation concerning any person who is under consideration by the nominating commission as a potential candidate for recommendation to the governor as a nominee for the position of director of the Tennessee bureau of investigation. The commission may contract with a private entity or the federal government to conduct the investigation. Upon the request of the governor, speaker of the senate, speaker of the house of representatives or chief justice, the director shall conduct the investigation, which shall include fingerprint submissions of the potential appointee to both the Tennessee bureau of investigation and federal bureau of investigation, and report the results to the governor, speaker of the senate, speaker of the house of representatives or chief justice, either verbally or in writing, as the governor, speaker of the senate, speaker of the house of representatives or chief justice may direct. The entity with which the nominating commission contracts shall report the results to the chair of the nominating commission, either verbally or in writing, as the chair of the nominating commission may direct.

All confidential information reported to the governor, speaker of the senate, speaker of the house of representatives or chief justice pursuant to subsection (b) shall remain confidential. Any background investigation requested by a nominating commission appointed pursuant to § 38-6-101, and any background investigation delivered to the governor by the commission, shall be treated as confidential.

The commission appointed pursuant to § 38-6-101 is authorized to contract with a private entity for other services, including, but not limited to, recruiting and screening applicants. Names of applicants and related records shall remain confidential, except to the extent such records are received by the commission; provided, however, that background investigations, and information that would remain confidential pursuant to § 10-7-504, if such applicants were employees of the state, shall remain confidential, even after receipt by the commission and the governor.

The authority granted by this section to the chief justice of the supreme court to request the Tennessee bureau of investigation to conduct background investigations is limited to investigations of persons applying or considered for the positions of:

Attorney general and reporter;

Clerk of the supreme court (appellate court clerk);

Administrative director of the courts;

Executive director, Tennessee lawyers' assistance program;

Chief disciplinary counsel, board of professional responsibility;

Executive director, Tennessee commission on continuing legal education and specialization; and

Executive director, Tennessee lawyers' fund for client protection.

The authority granted by this section to the speaker of the senate and speaker of the house of representatives to request the Tennessee bureau of investigation to conduct background investigations is limited to fifteen (15) requests per calendar year per speaker.

In addition to the authorization of the speaker of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives to request the director of the Tennessee bureau of investigation to conduct a background investigation concerning persons under consideration for appointment to a position of trust and responsibility, the chair of any standing committee to which the governor's notice of appointment has been referred pursuant to § 17-4-102 shall be provided with a background investigation of any gubernatorial appointee to the position of judge of the supreme court, court of appeals, or court of criminal appeals whose appointment will be considered by the committee as provided in § 17-4-102. Any report provided to the chair of the committee shall be treated as a confidential record that is not open to public inspection.

Acts 1980, ch. 636, § 14; T.C.A., § 38-506; Acts 1988, ch. 711, § 1; 2004, ch. 528, § 1; 2004, ch. 903, § 1; 2011, ch. 395, §§ 1-4; 2016, ch. 528, § 20.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning an orderly procedure for the appointment, confirmation, and retention of appellate court judges as required by Tennessee Constitution, Article VI, Section 3, please refer to Acts 2016, ch. 528.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment added (g).

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 528, § 23. January 28, 2016.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, § 10-7-504.

38-6-107. Certification of records by director.

The director is authorized to establish a procedure for the official attestation, sealing and certification of records, reports, documents and actions of the bureau that may be required or authorized by law, and to designate the persons responsible for the certification.

The procedures provided for in subsection (a) shall be filed with the secretary of state.

Acts 1981, ch. 512, § 8; T.C.A., § 38-507.

38-6-108. Use of dogs to detect illicit substances.

The Tennessee bureau of investigation is authorized to utilize dogs trained to detect marijuana and other illicit substances in its work, as may be desirable and appropriate.

Acts 1983, ch. 120, § 2.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

38-6-109. Verification of criminal violation information.

The Tennessee bureau of investigation shall process requests for criminal background checks from any authorized persons, organizations or entities permitted by law to seek criminal history background checks on certain persons, pursuant to a format and under procedures as it may require.

At the request of any persons, organizations or entities authorized by law to make fingerprint requests, the Tennessee bureau of investigation shall receive fingerprint samples from the persons, organizations or entities permitted by law to make those requests and shall check the prints against its records by using its computer files of criminal offenders contained in the Tennessee crime information center (T.C.I.C.) to process these requests and, to the extent permitted by federal law, shall also check the prints against records maintained by the federal bureau of investigation to determine if prior criminal history or convictions exist.

Upon completion of the search, the bureau shall report its findings to the requesting persons, organizations or entities authorized by law to receive such information.

Agencies or organizations that have an agreement to do so with the Tennessee bureau of investigation and that have any responsibility or authority under law for conducting criminal history background reviews of persons may also access directly the computer files of the T.C.I.C. using only names or other identifying data elements to obtain available Tennessee criminal history background information for purpose of background reviews.

If review by the method permitted by subdivision (c)(1) indicates the need for further verification of the individual's criminal history, and if authorized by the requesting entity's legal authority, the requesting entity may submit fingerprint samples for a criminal history background check by the Tennessee bureau of investigation as otherwise authorized by this section.

The fees for fingerprint searches shall be the same for a Tennessee search as for a federal bureau of investigation search and shall be according to the fee schedule established by the federal bureau of investigation.

The instant check unit of the Tennessee bureau of investigation shall contact the agency making the entry of an order of protection into the national crime information center within one (1) day if the subject of the order of protection attempts to purchase a firearm.

If a person who has been adjudicated as a mental defective or judicially committed to a mental institution attempts to purchase a firearm, and the instant check unit of the Tennessee bureau of investigation confirms the person's record by means of a record indicating the person's name, birth date, social security number, and either the person's sex or race, the unit shall contact, within twenty-four (24) hours, the chief law enforcement officer of the jurisdiction where the attempted purchase occurred for the purpose of initiating an investigation into a possible violation of law.

Acts 1985, ch. 478, § 28; 1996, ch. 1079, § 121; 2000, ch. 981, § 15; 2008, ch. 830, § 1; 2016, ch. 729, § 1; 2018, ch. 799, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For transfer of certain duties from the department of human services to the department of health, see Executive Order No. 6 (January 12, 1996).

Amendments. The 2016 amendment added (e).

The 2018 amendment added (f).

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 729, § 2. April 7, 2016.

Acts 2018, ch. 799, § 7. July 1, 2018.